Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-122] Limitations on backing.
(a) The driver of a vehicle shall not back it unless such movement can be made
with safety and without interfering with other traffic.

(b) The driver of a vehicle shall not back it
upon any shoulder or roadway of any controlled-access highway. [L 1971, c 150,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next